Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-202.5] Licensing. A producer
is not authorized to sell, solicit, or negotiate with respect to long-term care
insurance except as authorized by article 9A. [L 2007, c 233, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next